Utah statutes.
58-17b-309.6.   Exemptions from licensure for research using pharmaceuticals.

Research using pharmaceuticals, as defined in Subsection 58-17b-102(64), is exempt from licensure under Sections 58-17b-301 and 58-17b-302.



Enacted by Chapter 52, 2013 General Session

